src/import/nouns.lexc
lõunaline+N:l´õunaline OLULINE ;
lõunamaa+N:l´õuna#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
lõunamaalane+N:l´õuna#m´aalane SUULINE ;
lõunanaaber+N:l´õuna#n´aabE2r REDEL ;
lõunaosa+N:l´õuna#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
lõunapoolkera+N:l´õuna#p´ool#kera%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
lõunapäike+N:l´õuna#p´äi PÄIKE ;
lõunarannik+N:l´õuna#ran,nik VIRSIK ;
lõunasadam+N:l´õuna#sadam MAGUS ;
lõunaserv+N:l´õuna#s´erv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
lõunasöök+N:l´õuna#s´öök TAUD ;
lõunatoit+N:l´õuna#t´oit%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lõunatund+N:l´õuna#t´unD1 TAUD ;
lõunatuul+N:l´õuna#t´uul%{stemill%} KEEL ;
lõunauinak+N:l´õuna#uinak VIRSIK ;
lõunavaheaeg+N:l´õuna#vahe#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõust+N:l´õust%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
lõvi+N:lõv NIMI ;
lõvi+N:lõvi KAVA ;
lõvikoobas+N:lõvi#k´ooP2a KOTKAS ;
lõvilakk+N:lõvi#l´akk%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
lõviosa+N:lõvi#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
lõõg+N:l´õõG1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
lõõgastumine+N:lõõgastumine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõgastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõgastus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõm%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõmutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõmutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõp TAUD ;
lõõpija+N:l´õõpija AASTA ;
lõõpimine+N:l´õõpimine OLULINE ;
lõõpjutt+N:l´õõp#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõr+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõr TAUD ;
lõõritamine+N:lõõritamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõritus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõsk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõsK1%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõts+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´õõts%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
lõõtsatõmbaja+N:lõõtsa#t´õmbaja AASTA ;
lõõtsbuss+N:l´õõts#b´us,s TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsik VIRSIK ;
lõõtskaamera+N:l´õõts#kaamera AASTA ;
lõõtsmoonik+N:l´õõts#moonik VIRSIK ;
lõõtspill+N:l´õõts#p´il,l TAUD ;
lõõtspillimängija+N:l´õõts#pil,li#m´ängija AASTA ;
lõõtsutamine+N:lõõtsutamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lõõtsutus OLULINE ;
lödi+N:löd,i KAVA ;
löga+N:löga KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lömastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lömastus OLULINE ;
lömitaja+N:lömitaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lömitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lömitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lörts+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´örts TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lörtsutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lörtsutus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@löss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ös,s TAUD ;
lööberdaja+N:lööberdaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lööberdis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lööberdis OLULINE ;
löödu+N:l´öödu AASTA ;
löögijõud+N:löögi#j´õuD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
löögirusikas+N:löögi#rusika LOHAKAS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@löögitäpsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@löögi#t´äpsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@löögivalmidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@löögi#v´al,midus OLULINE ;
lööklaine+N:l´öök#l´aine PINGE ;
lööklane+N:l´ööklane SUULINE ;
lööklaul+N:l´öök#l´aul%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lööklus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ööklus SUULINE ;
lööknumber+N:l´öök#n´umbE2r REDEL ;
lööksõna+N:l´öök#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
lööktöö+N:l´öök#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
lööktööline+N:l´öök#t´ööline SUULINE ;
lööm+N:l´ööm%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
löömamees+N:lööma#me MEES ;
@P.Stem.Nom@löömar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´öömar REDEL ;
löömavend+N:lööma#v´enD1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
löömine+N:l´öömine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lööv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ööv TAUD ;
lööve+N:l´ööB2e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@löövus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´öövus SUULINE ;
lüdi+N:lüd,i KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühemus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühemus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühend+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühend REDEL ;
lühendamine+N:lühendamine OLULINE ;
lühendis+N:lühendis OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühendus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühidus OLULINE ;
lühifilm+N:lühi#f´il,m TAUD ;
lühijutt+N:lühi#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühikursus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühi#k´ursus SUULINE ;
lühilaine+N:lühi#l´aine PINGE ;
lühimaajooks+N:lühi#m´aa#j´ooks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
lühimaajooksja+N:lühi#m´aa#j´ooksja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühinägelikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühi#n`ägel´ikkus SUULINE ;
lühinõupidamine+N:lühi#n´õu#pidamine OLULINE ;
lühipala+N:lühi#pala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
lühiproosa+N:lühi#proosa PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühis SOOLANE ;
lühisekoht+N:lühise#k´ohT1%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühitutvustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühi#tutvustus OLULINE ;
lühiuudis+N:lühi#uudis SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühiühendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lühi#ühendus OLULINE ;
lüht+N:l´ühT1 TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lühter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ühtE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lükand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lükand REDEL ;
lükati+N:lükati AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lükk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ükk TAUD ;
lükra+N:l´ükra AASTA ;
lükra-sisaldus+N:l´ükra-sisaldus OLULINE ;
lüli+N:lül,i KAVA ;
lülisammas+N:lül,i#s´amB1a KOTKAS ;
lülitamine+N:lülitamine OLULINE ;
lüliti+N:lüliti AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lülitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lülitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lümf+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ümf TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lünk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ünk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lünklikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´ünkl´ikkus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lüpsik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lüpsik VIRSIK ;
lüpsilehm+N:lüpsi#l´ehm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
lüpsinaine+N:lüpsi#naine NAINE ;
lüpsja+N:l´üpsja AASTA ;
lüpsmine+N:l´üpsmine SUULINE ;
lürism+N:lür´ism TAUD ;
lüsi+N:lüS1 MESI ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lüsoform+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l`üsof´orm TAUD ;
lütseum+N:l´ütseum MUUSEUM ;
lüüasaamine+N:l´üüa#s´aamine OLULINE ;
lüüasaanu+N:l´üüa#saanu AASTA ;
lüüm+N:l´üüm TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lüümik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lüümik VIRSIK ;
lüüra+N:lüüra PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lüürik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@lüürik VIRSIK ;
lüürika+N:lüürika AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@lüüs+N:@P.Stem.Nom@l´üüs TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Single@m-s+N:@P.Stem.Single@m-N1S1 HALE ;
maa+N:m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
maa-ala+N:m´aa-ala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
maa-alune+N:m´aa-alune SOOLANE ;
maa-amet+N:m´aa-amet REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maaarmastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#armastus OLULINE ;
maabumine+N:m´aabumine OLULINE ;
maabumissild+N:m´aabumis#s´ilD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maadam+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aadam REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maadeavastus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aade#avastus OLULINE ;
maadleja+N:m´aadleja AASTA ;
maadlemine+N:m´aadlemine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maadlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aadlus SUULINE ;
maaeestlane+N:m´aa#´eestlane SUULINE ;
maaelanik+N:m´aa#`elan´ik ELANIK ;
maaelu+N:m´aa#elu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
maaema+N:m´aa#ema KAVA ;
maaerakond+N:m´aa#`erak´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maaettevõtlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#´ette#v´õtlus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maag+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aag TAUD ;
maage+N:m´aaK2e PINGE ;
maagia+N:m´aagia AASTA ;
maaharija+N:m´aa#harija AASTA ;
maaharimine+N:m´aa#harimine OLULINE ;
maahoki+N:m´aa#hoki PERE ;
maahärra+N:m´aa#härra PERE ;
maailm+N:m´aa#´ilm%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
maailmakaart+N:m´aa#ilma#k´aart TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmakaubandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#kaubandus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmakirjandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#kirjandus OLULINE ;
maailmaklass+N:m´aa#ilma#kl´as,s TAUD ;
maailmakodanik+N:m´aa#ilma#k`odan´ik ELANIK ;
maailmakultuur+N:m´aa#ilma#kult´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmakuulsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#k´uulsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmakõiksus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#k´õiksus SUULINE ;
maailmalava+N:m´aa#ilma#lava KAVA ;
maailmalinn+N:m´aa#ilma#l´inn%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
maailmalõpulugu+N:m´aa#ilma#lõpu#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmamajandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#majandus OLULINE ;
maailmameister+N:m´aa#ilma#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
maailmameistritiitel+N:m´aa#ilma#m´eistri#t´iitE2l REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmameistrivõistlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#m´eistri#v´õistlus SUULINE ;
maailmameri+N:m´aa#ilma#mer%{stemill%} MERI ;
maailmanimi+N:m´aa#ilma#nim NIMI ;
maailmanägemine+N:m´aa#ilma#nägemine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@maailmanäitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@m´aa#ilma#n´äitus SUULINE ;
maailmaorganisatsioon+N:m´aa#ilma#organisatsi´oon TAUD ;
maailmapank+N:m´aa#ilma#p´ank%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
maailmapilt+N:m´aa#ilma#p´il,t TAUD ;
maailmapraktika+N:m´aa#ilma#praktika AASTA ;
maailmapärand+N:m´aa#ilma#pärand REDEL ;
maailmarekord+N:m´aa#ilma#rekord REDEL ;
maailmarekordimees+N:m´aa#ilma#rekordi#me MEES ;
maailmaruum+N:m´aa#ilma#r´uum RUUM ;
maailmasõda+N:m´aa#ilma#sõJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
maailmatark+N:m´aa#ilma#t´ark%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
maailmatase+N:m´aa#ilma#tase HAARE ;
maailmaturg+N:m´aa#ilma#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
maailmavaade+N:m´aa#ilma#v´aaT2e PINGE ;
maailmavalu+N:m´aa#ilma#valu KAVA ;
